Utah statutes.
77-16a-302.   Persons found not guilty by reason of insanity -- Disposition.

(1)  Upon a verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity, the court shall conduct a hearing within 10 days to determine whether the defendant is currently mentally ill. The defense counsel and prosecutors may request further evaluations and present testimony from those examiners.

(2)  After the hearing and upon consideration of the record, the court shall order the defendant committed to the department if it finds by clear and convincing evidence that:

(a)  the defendant is still mentally ill; and

(b)  because of that mental illness the defendant presents a substantial danger to himself or others.

(3)  The period of commitment described in Subsection (2) may not exceed the period for which the defendant could be incarcerated had he been convicted and received the maximum sentence for the crime of which he was accused.  At the time that period expires, involuntary civil commitment proceedings may be instituted in accordance with Title 62A, Chapter 15, Substance Abuse and Mental Health Act.

